Hawaii statutes.
§372-2 Definitions. As used in
this chapter:

"Apprentice" means a worker at least
sixteen years of age, except where a higher minimum age standard is otherwise
fixed by law, who is employed to learn an apprenticeable occupation in
accordance with the standards of apprenticeship established by this chapter.

"Apprenticeship agreement" is a
written agreement between an apprentice and either the apprentice's program
sponsors or an apprenticeship committee acting as agent for the program
sponsors. The apprenticeship agreement shall be approved by the director.

"Apprenticeship committee" means a
group of persons designated by the sponsors to administer an apprenticeship
program. An apprenticeship committee may either be a joint committee
comprising an equal number of representatives of the employers and employees
represented by bona fide collective bargaining agents, or a non-joint
committee, known as a unilateral or group non-joint committee, that has
employer representatives and may include employees, but does not have a bona
fide collective bargaining agent as a participant.

"Department" means the department of
labor and industrial relations.

"Director" means the director of
labor and industrial relations.

"Sponsor" means any person, employer,
association, committee, or organization operating an apprenticeship program and
in whose name the program is, or is to be, registered and approved. [L Sp 1941,
c 23, pt of §§4, 5; am L 1943, c 158, pt of §2; RL 1945, pt of §§4145, 4146; am
L 1945, c 22, §1(1); am L 1955, c 31, §1(b); RL 1955, §89-2; am L 1959, c 14,
§1; am L 1967, c 20, §1(a); HRS §372-2; am L 2012, c 14, §3]

Previous
Vol07_Ch0346-0398
Next